tests/ger_aor.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "диэ": 
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><nom> : диир
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><par> : диирдэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><dat> : дииргэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><acc> : диири
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><abl> : дииртэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><ins> : дииринэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><com> : диирдиин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><comp> : диирдээҕэр

    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><nom> : диирим
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><par> : диирбинэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><dat> : диирбэр
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><acc> : диирбин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><abl> : диирбиттэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><ins> : диирбинэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><com> : диирбиниин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1sg><comp> : диирбинээҕэр

    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><nom> : диириҥ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><par> : дииргинэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><dat> : дииргэр
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><acc> : дииргин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><abl> : дииргиттэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><ins> : дииргинэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><com> : дииргиниин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2sg><comp> : дииргинээҕэр

    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><nom> : диирэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><par> : дииринэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><dat> : дииригэр
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><acc> : диирин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><abl> : диириттэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><ins> : дииринэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><com> : диириниин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px3sp><comp> : дииринээҕэр

    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><nom> : диирбит
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><par> : диирбитинэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><dat> : диирбитигэр
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><acc> : диирбитин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><abl> : диирбититтэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><ins> : диирбитинэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><com> : диирбитиниин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px1pl><comp> : диирбитинээҕэр

    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><nom> : дииргит
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><par> : дииргитинэ
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><dat> : дииргитигэр
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><acc> : дииргитин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><abl> : дииргититтэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><ins> : дииргитинэн
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><com> : дииргитиниин
    диэ<v><tv><ger_aor><px2pl><comp> : дииргитинээҕэр

  "көр":
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><nom> : көрөр
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><par> : көрөрдө
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><dat> : көрөргө
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><acc> : көрөрү
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><abl> : көрөртөн
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><ins> : көрөрүнэн
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><com> : көрөрдүүн
    көр<v><tv><ger_aor><comp> : көрөрдөөҕөр

  "олор": 
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><nom> : олорор
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><par> : олорордо
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><dat> : олорорго
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><acc> : олорору
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><abl> : олорортон
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><ins> : олорорунан
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><com> : олорордуун
    олор<v><iv><ger_aor><comp> : олорордооҕор
